Washington statutes.
RCW 42.56.155

Assistance by attorney general.

The attorney general's office may provide information, technical assistance, and training on the provisions of this chapter.

[ 2014 c 66 s 5.]

NOTES:

Findings—Short title—Effective date—2014 c 66: See notes following RCW 42.56.150.